Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Real Estate Subdivisions
§ 18-5-315.
Provisions minimum.

If any board has or enacts resolutions or regulations which impose requirements on subdividers or subdivisions which are more restrictive than the provisions of this article, the authority to enact such local resolutions or regulations being hereby granted, the local provisions are not superseded by the provisions of this article. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to allow any board to impose requirements that contravene the exemptions from this article as provided in W.S.

18-5-303

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 24; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2019 ch. 141, § 1, effective February 27, 2019.

The 2019 amendment

added the last sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 141, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

Severability. —

Section 2, ch. 176, Laws 1975, reads: “If any section of this act is declared invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such decision shall be limited to the section or sections expressly found invalid, and shall not affect or invalidate the remaining sections of this act, which shall remain in full force and effect.”

Quoted

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 18-5-316.
Requirements for large acreage subdivision permits.

Except as otherwise provided, a county may, by resolution, elect to apply the provisions of this article on a uniform basis to the sale or disposition of any land where the subdivision creates parcels that are thirty-five (35) acres or larger and up to one hundred forty (140) acres. Except as provided in this subsection, each lawfully recorded parcel of land on July 1, 2008 shall be exempted from all provisions of this section other than compliance with paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection and W.S.

18-5-317

and shall be allowed to be divided into not more than ten (10) parcels of one hundred forty (140) acres or less in size, provided that each new or remaining parcel is no less than thirty-five (35) acres. Parcels created pursuant to this exemption may be created at any time and may be created over a period of years through separate transactions. In no case, however, shall this exemption be used to create more than ten (10) parcels of land from each original parcel and each parcel created after July 1, 2008 shall be subject to this section and W.S.

18-5-317

as otherwise provided in this section. Boundary adjustments between or among parcels shall not be considered as a division of property subject to the limitations in this section. If a county elects to apply this article to sales or dispositions where the subdivision creates parcels that are thirty-five (35) acres or larger and up to one hundred forty (140) acres, unless the property is exempted under this subsection, the subdivider shall obtain a subdivision permit pursuant to this section. The provisions of W.S.

18-5-306

and

18-5-315

shall not be applicable to a subdivision of land under this section but nothing in this sentence shall prohibit application of lawfully adopted zoning provisions. Before granting the exemption provided in this subsection the board may require the person seeking the exemption to submit any or all of the following:

A legal description or recordable survey containing the following:

Date of preparation, scale and north arrow;

The location of the subdivision units including the section, township and range;

The location and dimension of access and utilities easements, which shall conform to the requirements of W.S. 18-5-303(b).

Evidence of compliance with paragraph (b)(ix) of this section;

If a centralized water supply system is proposed for the subdivision, a study evaluating the water supply system proposed and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study shall include information relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs, from a test well drilled within the subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well;
(iii) (A) If a centralized water supply system is proposed for the subdivision, a study evaluating the water supply system proposed and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study shall include information relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs, from a test well drilled within the subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well;

Where individual on-lot wells are proposed:

The study under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not be required and the words “NO PROPOSED CENTRAL WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM,” in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision; and

The board may require a study relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs from a test well drilled within the proposed subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well.

The board may require, and with respect to paragraph (ix) of this subsection shall require, the following information to be submitted with an application for a subdivision permit pursuant to this section:

Evidence that the proposed subdivision complies with any applicable zoning regulations;

A survey plat submitted by the subdivider containing the following:

Date of preparation, scale and north arrow;

The location of the subdivision including the section, township and range;

The location and dimension of existing and proposed lots, units, tracts, parcels, streets, alleys, roads, highways, public ways, utility rights-of-way, easements, parks and the location of proposed permanent buildings and structures if known.

Evidence that:

The subdivider or his duly authorized agent who offers any part of the subdivision for sale or who solicits any offers for the purchase thereof, may convey merchantable title subject only to noted reservations or restrictions of record and subject only to a proportionate share of real property taxes or assessments charged or assessed for the year in which any such sale may be legally effected; or

Binding arrangements have been made by the person or his duly authorized agent who offers any part of the subdivision for sale, to assure purchasers of any part of the subdivision that upon full payment of the purchase price a deed can and will be delivered conveying merchantable title subject only to noted reservations or restrictions of record and subject only to a proportionate share of such taxes and assessments thereon as may be levied or assessed for the year in which the sale may be legally effected.

A study evaluating the sewage system proposed for the subdivision and the adequacy and safety of the system. Where individual on-lot sewage systems are proposed, the words “NO PROPOSED CENTRALIZED SEWAGE SYSTEM,” in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision;

If the subdivider proposes to utilize adjoining property for sewers, drainage, sewer lines, power lines or other utilities, the subdivider shall provide copies of binding easements of not less than twenty (20) feet in width for the proposed facilities from each property owner over whose land such services shall extend and shall provide a minimum access roadway right-of-way of sixty (60) feet to the subdivision for all public ways. Where no or limited on-lot utility connections are proposed, the words “NO PROPOSED UTILITY CONNECTIONS” or “LIMITED UTILITY CONNECTIONS,” as appropriate, in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision. A permit shall not be denied for failure to provide on-lot utility connections;

A study evaluating the water supply system proposed for the subdivision and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study shall include information relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs, from a test well drilled within the proposed subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well;
(vi) (A) A study evaluating the water supply system proposed for the subdivision and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study shall include information relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs, from a test well drilled within the proposed subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well;

Where individual on-lot wells are proposed:

The words “NO PROPOSED CENTRAL WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM,” in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision; and

The board may require a study relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs from a test well drilled within the proposed subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well.

Documentation that adequate ingress and egress access has been provided to all proposed lots, units, tracts and parcels and that all proposed lots, units, tracts, parcels, streets, alleys and roadways within the subdivision conform to the minimum standards adopted by the board and applied uniformly throughout the county which shall not in itself constitute consent of the board to locate, repair or maintain roadways and facilities. If, however, the subdivider proposes to make any streets, alleys or roadways private, then the subdivider shall submit to the board properly acknowledged written certification that certain streets, alleys or roadways within the subdivision shall remain private and the board shall be under no obligation to repair, maintain or accept any dedication of these roads to the public use. If no such public maintenance is contemplated on any of the roads, the subdivider shall put a legend on the plat of the subdivision and on all offers, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase of lots within the subdivision showing the streets, alleys and roadways showing in capital letters “NO PUBLIC MAINTENANCE OF SPECIFIED STREETS OR ROADS”;

Documentation that the subdivider has adequate financial resources to develop and complete any facility proposed or represented to be the responsibility of the subdivider, including but not limited to water supply systems, sewage systems, streets and roadways. The applicant shall provide a performance bond, acceptable letter of credit or other sufficient financial commitment to assure that any facilities proposed or represented to be part of the subdivision will in fact be completed as proposed, or escrow sufficient monies out of land sales to guarantee that the above facilities are installed. The amount of any bond or other financial commitment or escrow required under this paragraph shall reflect the estimated costs of providing the facilities;

With respect to any water rights appurtenant to lands to be subdivided in accordance with this section and prior to final approval of the subdivision permit, the subdivider shall provide the following:

The intended disposition of the water rights by:

Written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to voluntarily abandon the water rights, cancel any unadjudicated permits or eliminate applicable lands from any unadjudicated permits. The subdivider shall notify any purchasers of this action;

Written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use or place of use to provide for beneficial use of the water rights outside the subdivision;

A plan, accompanied by written documentation from the state engineer approving the plan, for the distribution of the water rights appurtenant to the land to be subdivided. The plan shall specify the distribution of the water to the lots within the subdivision and shall include written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use, place of use or point of diversion or means of conveyance in accordance with W.S.

41-3-103

,

41-3-104

or

41-3-114

; or

Written documentation from the state board of control that it accepted an authorization to detach water rights appurtenant to the lands to be subdivided in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of control.

If the subdivision is located within lands served by or crossed by a ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system, evidence that the subdivider submitted the plan to the public entity, company, association or appropriators responsible for the ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system for review and recommendations at least sixty (60) days prior to the submittal of the application for the subdivision permit to the board; and

Evidence that the subdivider will specifically state on all offers relative to the subdivision the subdivider’s intent to comply with this paragraph and that the subdivider does not warrant to a purchaser that the purchaser shall have any rights to the natural flow of any stream within or adjacent to the proposed subdivision. The subdivider shall further state that Wyoming law does not recognize any riparian rights to the continued natural flow of a stream or river for persons living on the banks of the stream or river.

Evidence that all parcels of land created by the subdivision will be subject to written and recorded covenants or other instruments creating an entity, binding on subsequent owners of the land within the subdivision. The entities that may be used include, but are not limited to, special improvement districts, homeowners associations and mutual benefit corporations. The board shall not mandate the creation of an entity with the ability to interfere with any owner’s ability to use his private property, except to collect any assessment. The entity shall have the ability to address the following topics:

Maintenance and responsibility for common areas, roads and water supply systems and assessments against all parcels of land in the subdivision to defray the costs thereof;

Continued management of the entity.

The board shall require the applicant to obtain review and recommendations from the local conservation district regarding soil suitability, erosion control, sedimentation and flooding problems. The review and recommendations shall be completed within sixty (60) days.

The board shall require the applicant to obtain review and recommendations from a fire protection district in which any portion of the subdivision lies, from the authority having jurisdiction over fire prevention and protection in the area or from the nearest fire protection district if no part of the subdivision lies within a fire protection district, regarding adequacy of fire protection measures. If the entire subdivision does not lie within a fire protection district and no city, town or fire protection district is obligated to provide fire protection pursuant to an agreement authorized by law the subdivider shall put a legend on the plat of the subdivision and on all offers, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase of lots within the subdivision showing in capital letters “LOTS ARE NOT PART OF A FIRE PROTECTION DISTRICT AND FIRE PROTECTION IS NOT OTHERWISE PROVIDED”.

If the permit is approved the board shall require the applicant to put a legend on the plat and on all offers, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase of lots within the subdivision showing in capital letters “THE SURFACE ESTATE OF THE LAND TO BE SUBDIVIDED IS SUBJECT TO FULL AND EFFECTIVE DEVELOPMENT OF THE MINERAL ESTATE”.

Nothing in this section shall require the acquisition of a permit for the sale or disposition of lands that on or before July 1, 2008 have been developed and promoted as part of a large acre subdivision as evidenced by dated plat maps, sales brochures or other evidence acceptable to the board.

If the lots, units, tracts or parcels created pursuant to a permit issued under this section are used for agricultural purposes and otherwise qualify as agricultural land for purposes of W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), the lots, units, tracts or parcels shall be deemed not to be part of a platted subdivision for purposes of W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x)(B)(II).

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 88, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 2; ch. 60, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2022 ch. 107, § 1, effective March 22, 2022.

The 2009 amendment. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 59, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, added (b)(x).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added subparagraph designations (a)(iii)(A), (a)(iii)(B), and (a)(iii)(B)(I); substituted “for the subdivision” for “on the parcel or parcels” in the first sentence of (a)(iii)(A); in the second sentence of (a)(iii)(A), substituted “subdivision” for “parcel or parcels,” and “within the subdivision” for “on the parcel or parcels”; in (a)(iii)(B)(I), added “under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph,” and substituted “subdivision” for “parcel or parcels”; added subparagraph designations (b)(vi)(A), (b)(vi)(B), and (b)(vi)(B)(I); added (b)(vi)(B)(II); and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(ix), added “the following”; inserted the introductory language of (b)(ix)(A); added the (b)(ix)(A)(I) designation; redesignated former (b)(ix)(B) and (b)(ix)(C) as (b)(ix)(A)(II) and (b)(ix)(A)(III) and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2022 amendment

substituted “and with respect to paragraph (ix) of this subsection shall require” for “any or all of” in the introductory language of (b); added “permit,” in the introductory language of (b)(ix); rewrote (b)(ix)(A)(I), which read, “Evidence that the subdivider has submitted to the state engineer the documentation necessary to relinquish the water rights and has notified purchasers and the board of this action”; in (b)(ix)(A)(II), substituted “Written documentation from the state board of control” for “Evidence,” deleted “has” preceding “submitted,” substituted “board of control all documents” for “engineer the documentation,” deleted “or point of diversion” preceding “to provide”; in (b)(ix)(A)(III), substituted “accompanied by written documentation from the state engineer approving the plan” for “a copy of which was submitted to and approved by the state engineer prior to the final approval of the subdivision application” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added “written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control,” substituted “documents necessary to” for “appropriate applications for,” “the” for “of,” deleted “change of” preceding “place of,” “change in” preceding “point of”; added (b)(ix)(A)(IV); rewrote (b)(ix)(B), which read, “If the subdivision is located within an irrigation district or within lands, served by a ditch, irrigation company or association or by an unorganized ditch, evidence that the plan has been submitted to the district board company, or association, or the remaining appropriators in the case of an unorganized ditch for their review and recommendations; and”; in (b)(ix)(C), in the first sentence, substituted “the subdivider's” for “his,” “subdivider” for “seller,” “the purchaser” for “he,” in the second sentence, substituted “The subdivider” for “He,” deleted “the” preceding “Wyoming”; and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 107, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 22, 2022.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 18-5-317.
Subsequent sale of subdivided lots.

If any lot, unit, tract or parcel is created pursuant to a subdivision and the lot, unit, tract or parcel is sold pursuant to a contract for deed, notice of the contract for deed shall be recorded with the county clerk within ten (10) days after the contract was executed.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 88, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 18-5-318.
Large parcels used for agricultural purposes.

If any lot, unit, tract or parcel thirty-five (35) acres or more in size is used for agricultural purposes within a platted subdivision and otherwise qualifies as agricultural land for purposes of W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), the parcel shall be deemed not to be part of a platted subdivision for purposes of W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x)(B)(II).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 58, § 1, ch. 59, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 58, § 3, provides: “W.S.

18-5-318

as created by section 1 of this act and
W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x)(B)(II) as amended by section 2 of this act shall apply to any property tax assessed on or after January 1, 2009.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 58, § 4(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.